Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-1011
Flood plain management, defined.

Flood plain management shall mean the operation of an overall program of corrective and preventive measures for reducing flood damage, including but not limited to, flood control works and flood plain management regulations.

Laws 1983, LB 35, § 11.